Utah statutes.
62A-5-305.   Residency requirements -- Transportation of person to another
state.
(1)  A person with mental retardation who has a parent or guardian residing in
this state may be admitted to a mental retardation facility in accordance with
the provisions of this part.
(2)  If a person with mental retardation enters Utah from another state, the
division may have that person transported to the home of a relative or friend
located outside of this state, or to an appropriate facility in the state
where the person with mental retardation is domiciled.  This section does not
prevent a person with mental retardation who is temporarily located in this
state from being temporarily admitted or committed to a mental retardation
facility in this state.
